Utah statutes.
39-6-113.   Jurisdiction over offenses.
A person may not be tried or punished for any offense under Sections 39-6-66
through 39-6-106, unless the offense was committed while he was in a duty
status that includes but is not limited to annual training, inactive duty for
training, drill, duty under Title 10 or 32, United States Code, or while on
state active duty.
